Washington statutes.
RCW 19.146.005

Findings and declaration.

The legislature finds and declares that the brokering of residential real estate loans substantially affects the public interest, requiring that all actions in mortgage brokering be actuated by good faith, and that mortgage brokers, designated brokers, loan originators, and other persons subject to this chapter abstain from deception, and practice honesty and equity in all matters relating to their profession. The practices of mortgage brokers and loan originators have had significant impact on the citizens of the state and the banking and real estate industries. It is the intent of the legislature to establish a state system of licensure in addition to rules of practice and conduct of mortgage brokers and loan originators to promote honesty and fair dealing with citizens and to preserve public confidence in the lending and real estate community.

[ 2008 c 108 s 21; 2006 c 19 s 1; 1994 c 33 s 1; 1993 c 468 s 1; 1987 c 391 s 1.]

NOTES:

Findings—2008 c 108: See RCW 19.144.005.

Adoption of rules—Severability—1993 c 468: See notes following RCW 19.146.0201.

Effective dates—1993 c 468: See note following RCW 19.146.200.